District of Columbia statutes.
29-1004.06

Restated articles of organization.

A limited cooperative association, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the board of directors taken at a meeting for which the purpose is stated in the notice of the meeting, may adopt restated articles of organization that contain the original articles as previously amended. Restated articles may contain amendments if the restated articles are adopted in the same manner and with the same vote as required for amendments to the articles under § 29-1004.05(a). Upon filing, restated articles shall supersede the existing articles and all amendments.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 406 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.